Maryland, session 2025, HB1056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
20–610.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “RETAILER” MEANS A PERSON ENGAGED IN THE
RETAIL SALE OF GOODS.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, IF A COUNTY ENACTS A
LOCAL LAW THAT REQUIRES A RETAILER TO CHARGE AT THE POINT OF SALE A FEE
FOR PROVIDING A PLASTIC OR PAPER CARRYOUT BAG TO A CUSTOMER, THE COUNTY
SHALL IMPOSE AN EXCISE TAX ON ANY AMOUNT OF THE FEE THAT THE RETAILER
CHARGES THAT IS IN EXCESS OF THE MINIMUM AMOUNT REQUIRED BY THE LOCAL
LAW.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1056*

HOUSE BILL 1056
(C) (1) THE AMOUNT OF THE EXCISE TAX IMPOSED BY THE COUNTY
SHALL BE ON EACH CENT THAT THE RETAILER CHARGES IN EXCESS OF THE
MINIMUM AMOUNT REQUIRED BY LOCAL LAW AS FOLLOWS:
(I) FOR THE COUNTY WHERE THE RETAILER IS LOCATED,
ONE–THIRD OF EACH CENT; AND
(II) FOR THE STATE, ONE–THIRD OF EACH CENT.
(2) THE COUNTY SHALL:
(I) RETAIN THE EXCISE TAX REVENUE COLLECTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) REMIT THE EXCISE TAX REVENUE COLLECTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO THE COMPTROLLER TO BE CREDITED
TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(3) THE RETAILER MAY RETAIN THE REMAINING ONE–THIRD OF EACH
CENT CHARGED IN EXCESS OF THE MINIMUM AMOUNT REQUIRED BY LOCAL LAW TO
COVER ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS FOR COLLECTING AND REMITTING THE TAX UNDER
THIS SECTION.
(D) A COUNTY SHALL ADMINISTER AND COLLECT THE TAX UNDER THIS
SECTION IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE FEE ON PLASTIC OR PAPER CARRYOUT BAGS
REQUIRED BY LOCAL LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.